California statutes. Corporations Code
(1) The corporation is a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation which may not make distributions to its members except upon dissolution, or, if the articles or bylaws so provide, that it may not make distributions to its members during its life or upon dissolution.

(2) If there are restrictions upon the transferability, a statement that a copy of the restrictions are on file with the secretary of the corporation and are open for inspection by a member on the same basis as the records of the corporation.

(c) If the membership certificates are transferable only with consent of the corporation, or if there are no membership certificates, then instead of complying with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) the corporation may, or if there are no membership certificates, shall, give notice to the transferee, within a reasonable time after the corporation is first notified of the proposed transfer, and before the membership is transferred on the books and records of the corporation, of the information that would otherwise be provided by the legends required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(d) If the articles or bylaws are amended so that any statement required by subdivision (b) upon outstanding membership certificates is no longer accurate, then the board may cancel the outstanding certificates and issue in their place new certificates conforming to the articles or bylaw amendments.

(e) Where new membership certificates are issued in accordance with subdivision (d), the board may order holders of outstanding certificates to surrender and exchange them for new certificates within a reasonable time fixed by the board. The board may further provide that the holder of a certificate so ordered to be surrendered shall not be entitled to exercise any of the rights of membership until the certificate is surrendered and exchanged, but rights shall be suspended only after notice of such order is given to the holder of the certificate and only until the certificate is exchanged. The duty of surrender of any outstanding certificates may also be enforced by civil action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 378, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

7314.

(a) A corporation may issue a new membership certificate or a new certificate for any security in the place of any certificate theretofore issued by it, alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, and the corporation may require the owner of the lost, stolen or destroyed certificate or the owner’s legal representative to give the corporation a bond (or other adequate security) sufficient to indemnify it against any claim that may be made against it (including any expense or liability) on account of the alleged loss, theft or destruction of any such certificate or the issuance of such new certificate.

(b) If a corporation refuses to issue a new membership certificate or other certificate in place of one theretofore issued by it, or by any corporation of which it is the lawful successor, alleged to have been lost, stolen or destroyed, the owner of the lost, stolen or destroyed certificate or the owner’s legal representative may bring an action in the superior court of the proper county for an order requiring the corporation to issue a new certificate in place of the one lost, stolen or destroyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7315.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), or in its articles or bylaws, a corporation may admit any person to membership.

(b) A corporation may not admit its subsidiary (Section 5073) to membership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transfer of Memberships [7320. - 7320.]

7320.

Subject to Section 7613:

(a) Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide:

(1) No member may transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom; and

(2) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (b), all rights as a member of the corporation cease upon the member’s death or dissolution.

(b) The articles or bylaws may provide for, or may authorize the board to provide for, the transfer of memberships, or of memberships within any class or classes, with or without restriction or limitation, including transfer upon the death, dissolution, merger, or reorganization of a member.

(c) Where transfer rights have been provided, no restriction of them shall be binding with respect to memberships issued prior to the adoption of the restriction, unless the holders of such memberships voted in favor of the restriction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Types of Memberships [7330. - 7333.]

7330.

A corporation may issue memberships having different rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions, as authorized by its articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

7331.

Except as provided in or authorized by the articles or bylaws, all memberships shall have the same rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions and conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

7332.

(a) A corporation may provide in its articles for one or more classes of memberships which are redeemable, in whole or in part, at the option of the corporation, or the member for such consideration within such time or upon the happening of one or more specified events and upon such terms and conditions as are stated in the articles. However, no membership shall actually be redeemed if prohibited by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7410).

(b) Nothing in this section shall prevent a corporation from creating a sinking fund or similar provision for, or entering into an agreement for, the redemption or purchase of its memberships to the extent permitted by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 7410).

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7333.

(a) A corporation may refer to persons associated with it as “members” even though such persons are not members within the meaning of Section 5056; but references to members in this part mean members as defined in Section 5056. 

(b) A corporation may benefit, serve, or assist persons who are not members within the meaning of Section 5056 for such consideration, if any, as the board may determine or as is authorized or provided for in the articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Termination of Memberships [7340. - 7341.]

7340.

(a) A member may resign from membership at any time, although the articles or bylaws may require reasonable notice before the resignation is effective. 

(b) This section shall not relieve the resigning member from any obligation for charges incurred, services or benefits actually rendered, dues, assessments or fees, or arising from contract, a condition to ownership of land, an obligation arising out of the ownership of land, or otherwise, and this section shall not diminish any right of the corporation to enforce any such obligation or obtain damages for its breach.

(c) A membership issued for a period of time shall expire when such period of time has elapsed unless the membership is renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

7341.

(a) No member may be expelled or suspended, and no membership or memberships may be terminated or suspended, except according to procedures satisfying the requirements of this section. An expulsion, termination or suspension not in accord with this section shall be void and without effect.

(b) Any expulsion, suspension, or termination must be done in good faith and in a fair and reasonable manner. Any procedure which conforms to the requirements of subdivision (c) is fair and reasonable, but a court may also find other procedures to be fair and reasonable when the full circumstances of the suspension, termination, or expulsion are considered.

(c) A procedure is fair and reasonable when:

(1) The provisions of the procedure have been set forth in the articles or bylaws, or copies of such provisions are sent annually to all the members as required by the articles or bylaws;

(2) It provides the giving of 15 days’ prior notice of the expulsion, suspension or termination and the reasons therefor; and

(3) It provides an opportunity for the member to be heard, orally or in writing, not less than five days before the effective date of the expulsion, suspension or termination by a person or body authorized to decide that the proposed expulsion, termination or suspension not take place.

(d) Any notice required under this section may be given by any method reasonably calculated to provide actual notice. Any notice given by mail must be given by first-class or registered mail sent to the last address of the members shown on the corporation’s records.

(e) Any action challenging an expulsion, suspension or termination of membership, including any claim alleging defective notice, must be commenced within one year after the date of the expulsion, suspension or termination. In the event such an action is successful the court may order any relief, including reinstatement, it finds equitable under the circumstances, but no vote of the members or of the board may be set aside solely because a person was at the time of the vote wrongfully excluded by virtue of the challenged expulsion, suspension or termination, unless the court finds further that the wrongful expulsion, suspension or termination was in bad faith and for the purpose, and with the effect, of wrongfully excluding the member from the vote or from the meeting at which the vote took place, so as to affect the outcome of the vote.

(f) This section governs only the procedures for expulsion, suspension or termination and not the substantive grounds therefor. An expulsion, suspension or termination based upon substantive grounds which violate contractual or other rights of the member or are otherwise unlawful is not made valid by compliance with this section.

(g) A member who is expelled or suspended or whose membership is terminated shall be liable for any charges incurred, services or benefits actually rendered, dues, assessments or fees incurred before the expulsion, suspension or termination or arising from contract or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 589, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Rights and Obligations of Members and Creditors [7350. - 7354.]

7350.

(a) A member of a corporation is not, as such, personally liable for the debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation.

(b) No person is liable for any obligation arising from membership unless the person was admitted to membership upon the person’s application or with the person’s consent.

(c) The ownership of an interest in real property, when a condition of its ownership is membership in a corporation, shall be considered consent to such membership for the purpose of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7351.

A corporation may levy dues, assessments, or fees upon its members pursuant to its articles or bylaws, but a member upon learning of them may avoid liability for them by promptly resigning from membership, except where the member is liable for them by contract, as a condition to ownership of an interest in real property, as an obligation arising out of the ownership of an interest in real property, or otherwise. Article or bylaw provisions authorizing such dues, assessments or fees do not, of themselves, create such liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

7352.

A person holding a membership as pledgee or a membership as executor, administrator, guardian, trustee, receiver or in any representative or fiduciary capacity is not personally liable for any unpaid balance of the purchase price of the membership, or for any amount owing to the corporation by the member, because the membership is so held, but the estate and funds in the hands of such fiduciary or representative are liable and the membership subject to sale therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1085, Sec. 5.1.)
-------------------------------------------

7353.

(a) No action shall be brought by or on behalf of any creditor to reach and apply the liability, if any, of a member to the corporation to pay the amount due on such member’s membership or otherwise due to the corporation unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the corporation and execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless such proceedings would be useless.

(b) All creditors of the corporation, with or without reducing their claims to judgment, may intervene in any such creditor’s action to reach and apply unpaid amounts due the corporation and any or all members who owe amounts to the corporation may be joined in such action. Several judgments may be rendered for and against the parties to the action or in favor of a receiver for the benefit of the respective parties thereto.

(c) All amounts paid by any member in any such action shall be credited on the unpaid balance due the corporation by such member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7354.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as in derogation of any rights or remedies which any creditor or member may have against any promoter, member, director, officer or the corporation because of participation in any fraud or illegality practiced upon such creditor or member by any such person or by the corporation in connection with the issue or sale of memberships or securities or in derogation of any rights which the corporation may have by rescission, cancellation or otherwise because of any fraud or illegality practiced on it by any such person in connection with the issue or sale of memberships or securities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Distributions [7410. - 7420.]



  ARTICLE 1. Limitations [7410. - 7414.]

7410.

This chapter does not apply to any proceeding for winding up and dissolution of corporations under Chapters 15 (commencing with Section 8510), 16 (commencing with Section 8610), and 17 (commencing with Section 8710).

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7411.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no corporation shall make any distribution except upon dissolution.

(b) A corporation may, subject to meeting the requirements of Sections 7412 and 7413 and any additional restrictions authorized by Section 7414, purchase or redeem memberships.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

7412.

Neither a corporation nor any of its subsidiaries shall make a distribution if the corporation or the subsidiary making the distribution is, or as a result thereof would be, likely to be unable to meet its liabilities (except those whose payment is otherwise adequately provided for) as they mature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

7413.

Neither a corporation nor any of its subsidiaries shall purchase or redeem a membership of the parent or subsidiary if the articles of the corporation contain a provision authorized by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 7132 and such corporation or the subsidiary making the purchase or redemption is, or as a result thereof would be, likely to be unable to meet the obligations resulting from such article provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 60.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7414.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits additional restrictions upon the purchase or redemption of a membership by provision in a corporation’s articles or bylaws or agreement entered into by the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Liability of Members [7420. - 7420.]

7420.

(a) Any person who with knowledge of facts indicating the impropriety thereof receives any distribution, including a payment in redemption of a membership, prohibited by this chapter is liable to the corporation for the amount so received by the person with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments until paid.

(b) Any person who with knowledge of facts indicating the impropriety thereof receives any distribution, including a payment in redemption of a membership, prohibited by this chapter is liable to the corporation for the benefit of the head organization, or of all of the creditors entitled to institute an action under subdivision (c), for the amount so received by the person with interest thereon at the legal rate
 on judgments until paid, but not exceeding the obligations of the corporation owed to the head organization at the time of the violation, or the liabilities of the corporation owed to nonconsenting creditors at the time of the violation, as the case may be.

(c) Suit may be brought in the name of the corporation to enforce the liability (1) to creditors arising under subdivision (b) for a violation of Section 7411 or 7412 against any or all persons liable by any one or more creditors of the corporation whose debts or claims arose prior to the time of the distribution and who have not consented thereto, whether or not they have reduced their claims to judgment, or (2) to the head organization arising under subdivision (b) for a violation of Section 7413 against any or all persons liable by any head organization which pursuant to the corporation’s articles is entitled to a distribution of assets upon dissolution.

(d) Any person sued under subdivision (b) may implead all other persons liable under subdivision (b) and may in the absence of fraud by the moving party compel contribution, either in that action or in an independent action against persons not joined in that action.

(e) Nothing contained in this section affects any liability which any person may have under the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3439) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Civil Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 20.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Meetings and Voting [7510. - 7527.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [7510. - 7517.]

7510.

(a) Meetings of members may be held at a place within or without this state as may be stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no other place is stated or so fixed, meetings of members shall be held at the principal office of the corporation. Subject to any limitations in the articles or bylaws of the corporation, if authorized by the board of directors in its sole discretion, and subject to those guidelines and procedures as the board of directors may adopt, members not physically present in person (or, if proxies are allowed, by proxy) at a meeting of members may, by electronic transmission by and to the corporation (Sections 20 and 21), electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, participate in a meeting of members, be deemed present in person (or, if proxies
 are allowed, by proxy), and vote at a meeting of members, subject to subdivision (f).

(b) A regular meeting of members shall be held on a date and time, and with the frequency stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, but in any event in each year in which directors are to be elected at that meeting for the purpose of conducting such election, and to transact any other proper business which may be brought before the meeting.

(c) If a corporation with members is required by subdivision (b) to hold a regular meeting and fails to hold the regular meeting for a period of 60 days after the date designated therefor or, if no date has been designated, for a period of 15 months after the formation of the corporation or after its last regular meeting, or if the corporation fails to hold a written ballot for a period of 60 days after the date designated therefor, then the superior
 court of the proper county may summarily order the meeting to be held or the ballot to be conducted upon the application of a member or the Attorney General, after notice to the corporation giving it an opportunity to be heard.

(d) The votes represented, either in person (or, if proxies are allowed, by proxy), at a meeting called or by written ballot ordered pursuant to subdivision (c), and entitled to be cast on the business to be transacted shall constitute a quorum, notwithstanding any provision of the articles or bylaws or in this part to the contrary. The court may issue such orders as may be appropriate, including, without limitation, orders designating the time and place of the meeting, the record date for determination of members entitled to vote, and the form of notice of the meeting.

(e) Special meetings of members for any lawful purpose may be called by the board, the
 chairperson of the board, the president, or such other persons, if any, as are specified in the bylaws. In addition, special meetings of members for any lawful purpose may be called by 5 percent or more of the members.

(f) A meeting of the members may be conducted, in whole or in part, by electronic transmission by and to the corporation, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication if the corporation implements reasonable measures: (1) to provide members and proxyholders, if proxies are allowed, a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the members, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting concurrently with those proceedings, (2) if any member or proxyholder, if proxies are allowed, votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of electronic transmission to the corporation, electronic video screen
 communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, to maintain a record of that vote or action in its books and records, and (3) to verify that each person who has voted remotely is a member or proxyholder, if proxies are allowed. A corporation shall not conduct a meeting of members solely by electronic transmission by and to the corporation, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication unless one or more of the following conditions apply: (A) all of the members consent; (B) the board determines it is necessary or appropriate because of an emergency, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (m) of Section 7140; or (C) notwithstanding the absence of consent from all members pursuant to (A) or subdivision (b) of Section 20, the meeting includes a live audiovisual feed for the duration of the meeting. A corporation holding a meeting pursuant to (C) may offer, in addition to remote audiovisual feed, an audio-only means by which a
 member or proxyholder may participate provided that the choice between participating via audiovisual or via audio-only means is made by the member or proxyholder and the corporation does not impose any barriers to either mode of participation. A de minimis disruption of an audio or audiovisual feed does not require a corporation to end a meeting under, or render the corporation out of compliance with, this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 40.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7511.

(a) Whenever members are required or permitted to take any action at a meeting, a written notice of the meeting shall be given not less than 10 nor more than 90 days before the date of the meeting to each member who, on the record date for notice of the meeting, is entitled to vote thereat; provided, however, that if notice is given by mail, and the notice is not mailed by first-class, registered, or certified mail, that notice shall be given not less than 20 days before the meeting. Subject to subdivision (f), and subdivision (b) of Section 7512, the notice shall state the place, date and time of the meeting, the means of electronic transmission by and to the corporation (Sections 20 and 21), electronic video screen communication, conference
 telephone, or other means of remote communication, if any, by which members may participate in that meeting, and (1) in the case of a special meeting, the general nature of the business to be transacted, and no other business may be transacted, or (2) in the case of the regular meeting, those matters which the board, at the time the notice is given, intends to present for action by the members, but, except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 7512, any proper matter may be presented at the meeting for the action. The notice of any meeting at which directors are to be elected shall include the names of all those who are nominees at the time the notice is given to members.

(b) (1) Notice of a members’ meeting or any report shall be given personally, by electronic transmission by a
 corporation, or by mail or other means of written communication, addressed to a member at the address of the member appearing on the books of the corporation or given by the member to the corporation for purpose of notice, or if no such address appears or is given, at the place where the principal office of the corporation is located or by publication at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office is located. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the notice of a members’ meeting or any report may be sent by electronic communication or other means of remote communication if the board determines it is necessary or appropriate because of an emergency, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (m) of Section 7140. An affidavit of giving of any notice or report as permitted because of an emergency or otherwise in accordance with the provisions of this part,
 executed by the secretary, assistant secretary, or any transfer agent, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of the notice or report.

(2) If any notice or report addressed to the member at the address of the member appearing on the books of the corporation is returned to the corporation by the United States Postal Service marked to indicate that the United States Postal Service is unable to deliver the notice or report to the member at the address, all future notices or reports shall be deemed to have been duly given without further mailing if the same shall be available for the member upon written demand of the member at the principal office of the corporation for a period of one year from the date of the giving of the notice or report to all other members.

(3) (A) Notice given by electronic transmission by the corporation under this subdivision shall be valid only if it complies with Section 20. Notwithstanding the foregoing, notice shall not be given by electronic transmission by the corporation under this subdivision after either of the following:

(i) The corporation is unable to deliver two consecutive notices to the member by that means.

(ii) The inability to so deliver the notices to the member becomes known to the secretary, any assistant secretary, the transfer agent, or other person responsible for the giving of the notice.

(B) This paragraph shall not apply if notices are provided by electronic communication or other means of remote communication as permitted
 because of an emergency.

(c) Upon request in writing to the corporation addressed to the attention of the chairperson of the board, president, vice president, or secretary by any person (other than the board) entitled to call a special meeting of members, the officer forthwith shall cause notice to be given to the members entitled to vote that a meeting will be held at a time fixed by the board not less than 35 nor more than 90 days after the receipt of the request. If the corporation is a common interest development, as defined in Section 4100 of the Civil Code, the corporation shall cause notice to be given to the members entitled to vote that a meeting will be held at a time fixed by the board not less than 35 nor more than 150 days after receipt of the request. If the notice is not given within 20 days after receipt of the request, the
 persons entitled to call the meeting may give the notice or the superior court of the proper county shall summarily order the giving of the notice, after notice to the corporation giving it an opportunity to be heard. The court may issue such orders as may be appropriate, including, without limitation, orders designating the time and place of the meeting, the record date for determination of members entitled to vote, and the form of notice.

(d) When a members’ meeting is adjourned to another time or place, unless the bylaws otherwise require and except as provided in this subdivision, notice need not be given of the adjourned meeting if the time and place thereof (or the means of electronic transmission by and to the corporation or electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, if
 any, by which members may participate) are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken. No meeting may be adjourned for more than 45 days. At the adjourned meeting the corporation may transact any business which might have been transacted at the original meeting. If after the adjournment a new record date is fixed for notice or voting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each member who, on the record date for notice of the meeting, is entitled to vote at the meeting.

(e) The transactions of any meeting of members however called and noticed, and wherever held, are as valid as though had at a meeting duly held after regular call and notice, if a quorum is present either in person or by proxy, and if, either before or after the meeting, each of the persons entitled to vote, not present in person (or, if
 proxies are allowed, by proxy), provides a waiver of notice or consent to the holding of the meeting or an approval of the minutes thereof in writing. All such waivers, consents, and approvals shall be filed with the corporate records or made a part of the minutes of the meeting. Attendance of a person at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of and presence at the meeting, except when the person objects, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened and except that attendance at a meeting is not a waiver of any right to object to the consideration of matters required by this part to be included in the notice but not so included, if the objection is expressly made at the meeting. Neither the business to be transacted at nor the purpose of any regular or special meeting of members need be specified in any written waiver of
 notice, consent to the holding of the meeting or approval of the minutes thereof, unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, except as provided in subdivision (f).

(f) Any approval of the members required under Section 7222, 7224, 7233, 7812, 8610, or 8719, other than unanimous approval by those entitled to vote, shall be valid only if the general nature of the proposal so approved was stated in the notice of meeting or in any written waiver of notice.

(g) A court may find that notice not given in conformity with this section is still valid, if it was given in a fair and reasonable manner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 62.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7512.

(a) One-third of the voting power, represented in person or by proxy, shall constitute a quorum at a meeting of members, but, subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), a bylaw may set a different quorum. Any bylaw amendment to increase the quorum may be adopted only by approval of the members (Section 5034). If a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of the majority of the voting power represented at the meeting, entitled to vote, and voting on any matter shall be the act of the members unless the vote of a greater number or voting by classes is required by this part or the articles or bylaws.

(b) Where a bylaw authorizes a corporation to conduct a meeting with a quorum of less than
 one-third of the voting power, then the only matters that may be voted upon at any regular meeting actually attended, in person or by proxy, by less than one-third of the voting power are matters notice of the general nature of which was given, pursuant to the first sentence of subdivision (a) of Section 7511.

(c) Subject to subdivision (b), the members present at a duly called or held meeting at which a quorum is present may continue to transact business until adjournment notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough members to leave less than a quorum, if any action taken (other than adjournment) is approved by at least a majority of the members required to constitute a quorum or, if required by this division, or by the articles or the bylaws, the vote of the greater number or voting by classes.

(d) In the absence of a quorum, any meeting of members may be adjourned from time to time by the vote of a majority of the votes represented either in person or by proxy, but no other business may be transacted, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(e) For an election of directors of a corporation that is a common interest development, and in the absence of meeting quorum as required by the association’s governing documents or this section, unless a lower quorum for a reconvened meeting is authorized by an association’s governing documents, the corporation may adjourn the meeting to a date at least 20 days after the adjourned meeting, at which time the quorum required for purposes of a reconvened meeting to elect directors shall be 20 percent of the association’s
 members, voting in person, by proxy, or by secret ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 401, Sec. 2.   (AB 2460)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7513.

(a) Subject to subdivision (e), and unless prohibited in the articles or bylaws, any action which may be taken at any regular or special meeting of members may be taken without a meeting if the corporation distributes a written ballot to every member entitled to vote on the matter. Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws and if approved by the board of directors, that ballot and any related material may be sent by electronic transmission by the corporation (Section 20) and responses may be returned to the corporation by electronic transmission to the corporation (Section 21). That ballot shall set forth the proposed action, provide an opportunity to specify approval or disapproval of any proposal, and provide a reasonable time within which to return the ballot to the corporation.

(b) Approval by written ballot pursuant to this section shall be valid only when the number of votes cast by ballot within the time period specified equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action, and the number of approvals equals or exceeds the number of votes that would be required to approve at a meeting at which the total number of votes cast was the same as the number of votes cast by ballot.

(c) Ballots shall be solicited in a manner consistent with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 7511 and Section 7514. All such solicitations shall indicate the number of responses needed to meet the quorum requirement and, with respect to ballots other than for the election of directors, shall state the percentage of approvals necessary to pass the measure submitted. The solicitation must specify the time by which the ballot must be received in order to be counted.

(d) Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, a written ballot may not be revoked.

(e) Directors may be elected by written ballot under this section, where authorized by the articles or bylaws, except that election by written ballot may not be authorized where the directors are elected by cumulative voting pursuant to Section 7615.

(f) When directors are to be elected by written ballot and the articles or bylaws prescribe a nomination procedure, the procedure may provide for a date for the close of nominations prior to the printing and distributing of the written ballots.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 254, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7514.

(a) Any form of proxy or written ballot distributed to 10 or more members of a corporation with 100 or more members shall afford an opportunity on the proxy or form of written ballot to specify a choice between approval and disapproval of each matter or group of related matters intended, at the time the written ballot or proxy is distributed, to be acted upon at the meeting for which the proxy is solicited or by such written ballot, and shall provide, subject to reasonable specified conditions, that where the person solicited specifies a choice with respect to any such matter the vote shall be cast in accordance therewith. 

(b) In any election of directors, any form of proxy or written ballot in which the directors to be voted upon are named therein as candidates and which is marked by a member “withhold” or otherwise marked in a manner indicating that the authority to vote for the election of directors is withheld shall not be voted either for or against the election of a director.

(c) Failure to comply with this section shall not invalidate any corporate action taken, but may be the basis for challenging any proxy at a meeting or written ballot and the superior court may compel compliance therewith at the suit of any member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

7515.

(a) If for any reason it is impractical or unduly difficult for any corporation to call or conduct a meeting of its members, delegates or directors, or otherwise obtain their consent, in the manner prescribed by its articles or bylaws, or this part, then the superior court of the proper county, upon petition of a director, officer, delegate or member, may order that such a meeting be called or that a written ballot or other form of obtaining the vote of members, delegates or directors be authorized, in such a manner as the court finds fair and equitable under the circumstances.

(b) The court shall, in an order issued pursuant to this section, provide for a method of notice reasonably designed to give actual notice to all parties who would be entitled to notice of a meeting held pursuant to the articles, bylaws and this part, whether or not the method results in actual notice to every such person, or conforms to the notice requirements that would otherwise apply. In a proceeding under this section the court may determine who the members or directors are.

(c) The order issued pursuant to this section may dispense with any requirement relating to the holding of and voting at meetings or obtaining of votes, including any requirement as to quorums or as to the number or percentage of votes needed for approval, that would otherwise be imposed by the articles, bylaws, or this part.
